en_US.dic
Bar/H
Be/H
Dame/SN
Edi/H
Englishwoman/O
Gar/H
Hun/S
Irishman/O
Johna/H
Johns/N
Ky/H
Lapland/ZR
Niels/N
Scotchwoman/O
Se/H
Shakespearean/S
Welshwoman/O
abbreviate/XDSNG
abscond/SDRZG
abstain/GSDRZ
accelerate/NGSDXV
accepted/Y
accommodate/XVNGSD
add/ZGBSDR
adjourn/DGLS
adjudicate/VNGXSD
adjunct/VSY
admire/RSDZBG
adulterate/NGSDX
affect/GSD
agglomerate/XNGVDS
agglutinate/VNGXSD
aggregative/Y
agile/YTR
agree/LBDS
alderwoman/O
alleviate/SDVGNX
amalgamate/VNGXSD
ambush/ZRSDG
amorphous/PY
amount/SRDZG
amuse/LDSRGVZ
anchorperson/SQ
annex/GSD
annihilate/XSDVGN
antiquate/NGSD
antithetical/Y
append/SGZDR
applicate/V
appraise/ZGDRS
are/BS
arraign/SDGL
articulate/VGNYXPSD
arty/TPR
aspirate/NGDSX
assassinate/DSGNX
assemblyman/O
athletic/S
attach/BLGZDRS
attack/GBZSDR
attributive/SY
av/ZR
back/GZDRSJ
backhand/RDSZG
baggageman/O
bank/GZJDRBS
barbed/P
bark/GZDRS
barman/O
bat/SDRG
beak/ZSDR
beat/NRGSBZJ
beautify/SRDNGXZ
beguile/RSDLZG
behold/ZGRNS
bejewel/SDG
bellman/O
beseeching/Y
bifurcate/SDXGNY
bill/JGZSBDR
billion/SH
bird/SDRGZ
bland/PYRT
blockade/ZGRSD
bloom/SRDGZ
blunt/PSGTYRD
bombard/LDSG
bondman/O
bookkeep/GZJR
bore/ZGJDRS
bouncing/Y
bouncy/TRP
brakeman/O
brave/DSRGYTP
bread/SDHG
broach/DRSG
broil/RDSGZ
brown/YRDSJGTP
bruise/JGSRDZ
bucktooth/DQ
budget/GRDZS
buoyancy/S
burn/GZSDRBJ
businessperson/SQ
calculate/XNGDS
callow/RTSP
cameraman/O
camouflage/DRSGZ
cancelate/D
candle/GZRSD
canny/RPT
capt/V
carping/Y
caste/HS
catch/BRSJLGZ
categorize/RSDGZ
cautious/PY
caveman/O
certify/DRSZGNX
chamber/SZGDR
channel/DRZSG
channelize/GDS
chapter/SGD
check/GZBSRD
chelate/XDNG
chessman/O
circumvent/SBGD
classy/PRT
cleanly/PRT
clergyman/O
clever/RYPT
climb/BGZSJRD
clobber/DGS
clonk/SGD
code/SZGJRD
collocate/XSDGN
colorblind/P
combat/SVGD
commence/LDSG
committeeman/O
complete/BTYVNGPRSDX
complex/TGPRSDY
compliant/Y
compromise/SRDGZ
conceive/BGRSD
concept/SV
concert/DSG
condemn/ZSGRDB
condensate/NXS
confabulate/XSDGN
conform/SBDG
congest/VGSD
congressperson/SQ
conman/O
conspicuous/YP
construct/SDGV
contain/SLZGBRD
contemplate/DGNSVX
contest/RDBZGS
contraindicate/SDVNGX
convect/DSVG
cool/YDRPJGZTS
copyright/SRDGZ
correlate/SDXVNG
corroborator/S
coruscate/XSDGN
costive/PY
counterman/O
court/GZYRDS
covariate/SN
covenant/SGRD
crafty/TRP
cross/ZTYSRDPBJG
crumb/GSYD
cub/DRSZG
cuddly/TRP
curs/SDVG
curvy/RT
cutworm/S
dainty/TPRS
dairyman/O
dale/SH
damage/ZGRSD
dapper/PSTRY
decertify/N
decide/GRSDB
decimate/XNGDS
deescalate/DSXGN
defeat/ZGD
defile/L
defrost/SZRDG
degenerate/DGNPSVYX
dehydrogenate/DSGN
deliberate/DGNPSVYX
demonstrative/YP
denote/SBDG
depopulate/XNGDS
depreciate/XDSNGV
depute/SDG
desalinate/NGSDX
deserve/RSJDG
destine/GSD
desynchronize/GDS
detach/LSRDBG
detect/DBSVG
determinate/YPVXN
devote/XSDGN
dewy/TPR
dilate/XVNGSD
dilated/YP
dire/YTRP
disable/LZGD
disambiguate/DSGNX
disappoint/LSDG
discount/B
disembowel/SLGD
disgrace/SRDG
disgruntle/DSLG
dish/SDG
disorientate/SDXGN
disparage/RSDLG
disprove/SBDG
disrepute/SB
disrupt/GVDRS
dissonant/Y
do/TZRHGJ
double/GPSRDZ
doz/XGNDRS
drape/SRDGZ
dray/SDG
dribble/DRSGZ
drunk/SRNYT
dry/GYDRSTZ
ear/GSDYH
earthwork/S
eat/SJZGNRB
ebullient/Y
edify/ZNXGRSD
effect/SDGV
eighty/SH
elope/SRDLG
emanate/XSDVNG
emote/SDVGNX
emotionalize/GDS
emplace/L
enable/SRDZG
enact/SGLD
encode/ZJGSRD
encourage/SRDGL
enforce/LDRSZG
enlighten/GDSL
enslave/ZGLDSR
entitle/GLDS
envelop/ZGLSDR
ephemeral/SY
erosive/P
erudite/NYX
escape/LGSRDB
establish/LGSD
eulogize/GRSDZ
evacuate/DSXNGV
evaporate/VNGSDX
execute/NGVZBXDRS
execution/ZR
exercise/ZDRSGB
exhaust/VGRDS
expensive/YP
exponentiate/XSDNG
express/GVDRSY
expunge/GDSR
exterminate/XNGDS
extradite/XNGSDB
eyetooth/Q
fag/S
famish/GSD
farce/SDG
fatherly/P
feat/YRGTS
feeble/TPR
fend/RDSZG
ferryman/O
fest/RVZ
fiddle/GZJRSD
fifteen/HRS
filtrate/SDXNG
fir/ZGJDRHS
flick/GZSRD
flinch/GDRS
float/SRDGJZ
floodgate/S
fluky/RT
fly/JGBDRSTZ
focus/SRDBG
follow/JSZBGRD
foppish/YP
forbidding/YPS
foreperson/SQ
formulate/GNSDX
forty/SRH
fourteen/SRH
freeman/O
front/GSRD
funny/RSPT
futuristic/S
gallop/GSRDZ
gar/SL
garish/YP
gaseous/YP
gather/JRDZGS
gentrify/NSDGX
gerund/SV
giggle/RSDGZ
gimmick/GDS
give/HZGRS
glacé/DGS
glossy/RSPT
golf/RDGZS
goose/Q
govern/LBGSD
grammar/S
grandiose/YP
gregarious/PY
ground/JGZDRS
groundsman/O
grow/GZYRHS
gummy/RTP
hammer/ZGSRD
hard/YNRPJGXTS
hatter/S
haze/DSRJZG
he/VZ
heal/DRHSGZ
hellish/PY
helmsman/O
henpeck/GSD
hint/GZDRS
homely/RPT
honor/RDBZGS
houseparent/S
humidify/RSDXGNZ
hundred/SHR
hunt/GZJDRS
huntsman/O
ideal/YS
illustrate/VGNSDX
immediate/YP
impinge/LS
import/SZGBRD
impregnate/DSXNG
incept/DGVS
incinerate/XNGSD
incomprehension/S
indebted/P
inert/SPY
infringe/LR
inject/GVSDB
innovate/SDVNGX
inordinate/YP
instantiate/SDXNG
instinct/VS
insure/BZGS
integrate/GNXDS
intonate/NX
intrude/ZGDSR
irreplaceable/P
irrespective/Y
irritate/DSXNGV
jetty/RSDGT
journey/DRZSGJ
kinswoman/O
kludge/RSDGZ
knock/GZSJRD
lacerate/NGVXDS
lactate/NGSDX
lapse/SDG
launder/SDRZJG
layperson/SQ
leafy/PTR
legman/O
leisurely/P
license/GBRSD
liquidity/S
live/YHZTGJDSRPB
lodge/GZSRDJ
longitudinal/Y
lousy/PRT
love/DSRYZGJB
lubricate/VNGSDX
lurid/YP
madwoman/O
maladjust/DLV
maraca/S
marl/DSG
mart/DNGXS
mat/SJGDR
match/BRSDZGJ
matzo/SH
maze/GDSR
medicate/DSXNGV
militiaman/O
minute/RSDPTYG
miscellaneous/PY
misplace/GLDS
miss/SDGV
misspell/SGJD
modest/TRY
moisten/ZGRD
mountebank/SGD
mugwump/S
mummify/XSDGN
murder/GZRDS
mute/PDSRBYTG
nasty/TRSP
neck/GRDJS
needless/YP
new/SPTGDRY
newswoman/O
nineteen/SH
nor/H
norther/Y
notify/NGXSRDZ
one/NPSX
onerous/YP
oppress/DSGV
organize/GZDRS
outboast/GSD
outsmart/SDG
outsource/SDJG
overgraze/SDG
overgrow/GSH
overpay/LSG
ovulate/GNXDS
palm/GSDR
panicky/RT
parenthetical/Y
patrolman/O
pave/GDRSJL
pay/GSLB
peculate/NGDSX
perfidious/YP
periscope/SDG
person/BSQ
physiography/S
pi/ZGDRH
pike/ZGDRS
pile/JDSZG
placate/NGVXDRS
plunk/ZGSRD
policewoman/O
polish/RSDZGJ
polite/PRTY
pontifical/YS
positive/RSPYT
preach/DRSGLZJ
preallocate/XGNDS
premeditate/XDSGNV
premix/GDS
prevent/BSDRGV
privatize/GSD
prognosticate/NGVXDS
promote/GVZBDR
prospector/S
prudent/Y
pudgy/PRT
punch/GRSDJBZ
punish/RSDGBL
purple/TGRSD
quintillion/H
r/TGVJ
ramify/XNGSD
rant/GZDRJS
rat/DRSJZGB
ratify/ZSRDGXN
reanalyze/DRSZG
reassess/GL
reattempt/DSG
recluse/VNS
recondition/GSJD
redeem/BRZ
reedy/PTR
reenact/SGLD
reference/GSRD
reinforce/GSRDL
reiterate/SDXVGN
rel/V
reliant/Y
relink/G
reminisce/GSD
remunerate/VNGXSD
repair/BZGR
require/LR
resolute/NPSRTVYX
restore/RSZDG
retrogress/SDVG
return/ZGRDBS
revet/L
ride/ZSGR
riot/SDRGZJ
roister/SZGRD
roof/DRJGZS
rootless/P
row/SJZGNDR
rusty/XNRTP
salesperson/SQ
saleswoman/O
saturate/XDRSNG
scaffold/JGDS
scepter/DSG
scorching/Y
scour/SRDGZ
scrubby/TR
scruffy/PRT
scrutinize/RSDGZ
season/JRDYBZSG
secure/PGTYRSDJ
serve/GDSR
sett/BJGZSR
seven/SH
seventy/SH
shirt/JDSG
shitty/RT!
signalman/O
sissy/TRS
sixteen/HRS
sizable/P
skimp/GDS
slave/DSRGZ
sleepwalk/JGRDZS
slick/PSYRDGTZ
sluggish/YP
smart/YRDNSGTXP
sneeze/SRDG
snoopy/RT
snuggle/GDS
sooth/GZTYSRDJ
sou/SH
southern/PZSYR
spell/RDSJGZ
splotchy/RT
spokesperson/SQ
squeal/RDSGZ
squeegee/DS
stableman/O
stealthy/PTR
steelwork/ZSR
stiffen/JZRDG
stolid/PTYR
store/DSRG
strait/XTPSGYDNR
stretch/BDRSZG
strew/GDHS
structural/Y
sublime/GRSDTYP
subordinate/YVNGXPSD
suet/S
supervise/SDGNX
supply/ZGSRD
surf/SJDRGZ
surly/TPR
surrogate/SDNG
swanky/PTRS
swordsman/O
tarnish/GDS
tart/PYRDGTS
taste/GZJSRD
tax/ZGJDRSB
tee/DRSM
ten/HB
terminological/Y
th/GNJX
thirty/HS
thump/RDSG
tidy/GDSRPT
tile/DRSJZG
time/DRSJYZG
toil/SGZRD
tolerate/XVNGSD
tooth/DGQ
tor/SL
torrid/RYTP
torture/ZGSRD
triangulate/YGNXSD
tribeswoman/O
trillion/SH
trophy/GDS
turn/ZGRDBS
twitch/GRSD
typewrite/SRJZG
umpteen/H
unashamed/Y
uncertain/P
unhappy/TPR
universalize/DSRZG
unperson/Q
unprepared/P
unroll/DSG
unsmiling/Y
vaccinate/NGSDX
variable/PS
vaunt/GRDS
ventilate/XSDVGN
venture/RSDJZG
vituperate/SDXVGN
vivid/PTYR
waitperson/SQ
wall/SGRD
watch/JRSDGZB
weal/HS
wearisome/YP
wheeze/SDG
whisk/GZRDS
wild/SPGTYRD
wingman/O
wonder/GLRDS
wonky/RT
woo/DRZGS
woodwork/SRGZJ
yachtsman/O
yam/S
young/TRYP
zero/SDHG
